District of Columbia statutes.
22-3751

Enhanced penalties for offenses committed against taxicab drivers.

Any person who commits an offense listed in § 22-3752 against a taxicab driver who, at the time of the offense, has a current license to operate a taxicab in the District of Columbia or any United States jurisdiction and is operating a taxicab in the District of Columbia may be punished by a fine of up to one and 1 /2 times the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense and may be imprisoned for a term of up to one and 1 /2 times the maximum term of imprisonment otherwise authorized for the offense, or both.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-307, § 2, 48 DCR 600
July 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-206, § 2(a), 55 DCR 5168
This section is referenced in § 22-3752.
D.C. Law 17-206, in the section name line, inserted “for offenses committed against taxicab drivers”; and substituted “operating” for “lawfully operating”.